Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-427
Adult facility; escapee.

When any inmate escapes from any Department of Correctional Services adult facility, the chief executive officer of the facility shall use all proper means for the apprehension of the inmate.

Laws 1897, c. 75, § 34, p. 341;

R.S.1913, § 7339;

C.S.1922, § 6999;

C.S.1929, § 83-936;

R.S.1943, § 83-427;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 37.